New York, session 2025-2026, S6040.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2803-z-1 to read as follows: 3 § 2803-z-1. Integrated pest management requirements for hospitals. 1. 4 For purposes of this section, the following terms are defined: 5 (a) "Integrated pest management" means a decision-making process for 6 pest control that utilizes regular monitoring to determine if and when 7 controls are needed; employs physical, mechanical, cultural, biological 8 and educational tactics to control conditions that promote pest infesta- 9 tions and to keep pest populations at tolerable damage or annoyance 10 levels; and only as a last resort, utilizes least-toxic pesticide 11 controls. The overall goals of integrated pest management are to elimi- 12 nate the unnecessary use of pesticides and reduce the use of all pesti- 13 cides. 14 (b) "Facilities" means hospital buildings, land and other appurtenanc- 15 es. 16 2. To ensure that hospitals are safe and healthy environments for 17 patients, visitors and hospital staff members, certain requirements 18 shall be placed on pesticide use in hospital facilities. 19 (a) Each hospital shall have a pest management plan for all pest 20 control activities. Such plan shall utilize integrated pest management 21 techniques to manage and control pests and problems. Each integrated 22 pest management plan shall include a provision for public access to all 23 information about the implementation of the plan. Hospitals may estab- 24 lish advisory committees to assist in the development of integrated pest 25 management plans, and to monitor the implementation of such plans. No EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10570-01-5 S. 6040 2 1 hospital shall conduct or have conducted any pesticide application to 2 its facilities which is preventative in nature and which does not 3 respond to a verifiable pest problem. 4 (b) Each hospital shall be responsible for providing an annual evalu- 5 ation of the implementation of its integrated pest management plan to 6 the department. Every hospital shall update its integrated pest manage- 7 ment plan at least once every three years. 8 (c) Every pesticide application at a hospital facility shall be 9 conducted by a certified commercial pesticide applicator. No such appli- 10 cation shall be conducted by a person not so certified regardless of 11 whether such person is working under the direct supervision of a certi- 12 fied commercial pesticide applicator. 13 (d) A notice of pesticide application and a copy of the pesticide 14 label shall be prominently posted in a common area of a building which 15 is to receive a pesticide application. Such common area shall be readily 16 accessible to all persons in the building. Such notice and pesticide 17 label shall remain posted for not less than forty-eight hours following 18 the pesticide application. The notice of pesticide application shall 19 include, but not be limited to, the name and telephone number of a 20 hospital employee or contact person who shall provide detailed informa- 21 tion on the pesticide application. A copy of the pesticide label shall 22 be made available to any person requesting such label within twenty-four 23 hours of such request. 24 (e) When pesticides are applied to hospital grounds, turf, trees or 25 shrubs, visual notification markers, as provided by section 33-1003 of 26 the environmental conservation law, shall be posted at least every fifty 27 feet with at least one marker on each side of the application area. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 29 it shall have become a law.